District of Columbia statutes.
2-1431.06

Transfer of functions from the Mayor’s Committee on Persons with Disabilities.

(a)

As of October 1, 2008, the Mayor shall transfer to the Office all functions and records of the Mayor’s Committee on Persons with Disabilities.

(b)

The Mayor’s Committee on Persons with Disabilities shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Office and shall be actively involved in the development of the ADA Compliance Program and the Olmstead Compliance Program.

History

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-239, § 7, 54 DCR 404